Maine, session 132, LD2111.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. P&SL 1953, c. 156, §3, as repealed and replaced by P&SL 2023, c. 12, §1,
is amended to read:
Sec. 3. Board of trustees; district school committee. Except as provided by
this Act, the board of trustees and district school committee have the duties and authority
pursuant to the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 20-A, chapter 105. The board of trustees may
shall act as a building and facilities governing committee and has authority over capital
expenditures and the district's capital reserve fund, including authority in consultation with
the district school committee over the budget for maintaining, repairing, replacing and
improving the community school district's buildings and other facilities and over the
district's capital reserve funds for noninstructional capital purchases. The community
school district may vote in accordance with Title 20-A, section 1651, subsection 4 to have
the district school committee perform the duties of the board of trustees. The board of
trustees and the district school committee shall have distinct areas of responsibility or
authority as outlined in this Act and in Title 20-A, chapter 105. If issues arise involving
overlapping responsibilities, the board of trustees and district school committee shall create
joint bylaws or procedures as necessary to further assist them in understanding and
executing their duties and responsibilities to the community school district.
Sec. 2. P&SL 1953, c. 156, §6, as repealed and replaced by P&SL 2023, c. 12, §1,
is repealed and the following enacted in its place:
Sec. 6. Budget approval. The board of trustees shall prepare the revenues and
expenditures for the capital portion of the budget in accordance with section 3. The district
school committee shall prepare the revenues and expenditures for the operating portion of
the budget. The district school committee shall integrate the capital and operating portions
of the budget into cost centers in accordance with the cost center summary budget format
and shall submit the budget to the budget meeting for the budget validation referendum
procedure under the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 20-A, chapter 105, subchapter 3. The
board of trustees may prepare other articles related to capital needs, such as capital reserve
Page 1 - 132LR2831(03)

fund articles, for the budget meeting. The district school committee shall include these
articles in the warrant for the budget meeting.
Page 2 - 132LR2831(03)